Arkansas, session 2025, HB1673.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-20-303 is amended to read as follows:
17-20-303. Application.
(a) Any person, firm, or corporation desiring to operate as a barber,
barber student, teacher manager instructor, teacher manager instructor
student, barbershop, barber corporation, or barber school or college shall
file an application for a certificate of registration on a form furnished by
the State Board of Barber Examiners and pay the application fee.
(b) Any person who desires to practice barbering in this state shall
file with the Director of the State Board of Barber Examiners a written
application, duly notarized, with certification of at least one thousand five
hundred (1,500) hours of barber training, together with:
(1) Two (2) identical passport-sized signed photographs; and
(2) A copy of his or her driver’s license or record of state or
federal identification card; and.
(3) A copy of his or her Social Security card.
(c) A barber applying for reciprocity who has an unrevoked and
unexpired license issued by the proper authorities of another state
certifying that he or she has completed a minimum of one thousand five
hundred (1,500) hours of training, may be issued a certificate of
*LGL123*
03-18-2025 14:06:20 LGL123

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 HB1673
registration as a registered barber upon making the application as required
by this chapter and upon the payment of a reciprocity fee that shall include
the license fee until the beginning of the next renewal period.
(d)(1) An unlicensed person applying for a license who has at least
one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours of barber training may be granted
registration by examination upon proof of training by the state board in the
state in which the person received the training or by another appropriate
authority and upon making application as required by law and upon payment of
an application fee and examination fee.
(2) To obtain registration in this state as a registered barber,
A a barber applying for reciprocity who has an unrevoked an unexpired license
issued by the proper authorities of another state and who has fewer than one
thousand five hundred (1,500) hours of barber training:
(A) must Must:
(i) also have Have been continuously engaged in the
practice of barbering for at least one (1) year, in addition to providing
proof of licensure and training by the state board proper authorities of the
state where the applicant received training or holds a license,; or
(ii) complete Complete the required number of one
thousand five hundred (1,500) hours, of barber training; and
(B) Must:
(i) File an application with the State Board of
Barber Examiners; and
(ii) Pay a reciprocity fee and upon making
application as required by law and upon payment of a reciprocity fee.
(e)(1) A person barber applying for reciprocity who is licensed in has
an unrevoked and unexpired license issued by the proper authorities of a
foreign country as a barber is required to pass a practical examination
administered by the State Board of Barber Examiners and pay the examination
fee to qualify for a license in this state.
(2) All documents submitted for the purpose of complying with
the requirements for examination shall be original copies and translated into
the English language.
(3) The application shall be accompanied with a money order for
the reciprocity and examination fee.
(f) A person who has been continuously licensed or registered in
03-18-2025 14:06:20 LGL123

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 HB1673
another state to practice barbering as a teacher manager instructor who also
meets the requirements under § 17-20-406 may be issued a certificate of
registration as a registered barber and teacher manager instructor upon
making application as required by law and upon payment of a reciprocity fee
to obtain registration in this state as a registered barber, plus a teacher
manager instructor reciprocity fee.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-20-304(a), concerning examinations for a
certificate of registration to practice as a registered barber, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) An applicant for a certificate of registration to practice as a
registered barber who fails to pass a satisfactory examination conducted by
the State Board of Barber Examiners may apply for another examination at any
future meeting of the board shall pass an examination approved by the State
Board of Barber Examiners.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-20-307(d)(1), concerning a personal
lifetime barber license, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) A barber who holds a current license in this state shall be
issued a personal lifetime license at eighty (80) years of age upon his or
her request.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-20-308(7), concerning grounds for
disciplinary action related to barbers, is amended to read as follows:
(7) Immoral or unprofessional Unprofessional conduct;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 17-20-404(a)(7), concerning an application
for a license and approval as a registered school or college of barbering, is
amended to read as follows:
(7)(A) Evidence Except as provided under subdivision (a)(7)(B),
evidence that a performance surety bond of ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
guaranteeing the operation of the school or college has been secured.
(B) A registered school or college of barbering that is
also a public education entity, a state-supported institution of higher
education, or any other state-supported entity as determined by the State
Board of Barber Examiners is not required to secure a surety bond under
03-18-2025 14:06:20 LGL123

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 HB1673
subdivision (a)(7)(A) of this section.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 17-20-406(a)(1), concerning teacher manager
instructor certification for barber schools, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Application for examination for a teacher manager instructor
certificate shall be filed with the State Board of Barber Examiners on blank
forms prepared and furnished by the board and shall be accompanied by the fee
prescribed in § 17-20-409.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 17-20-407(c), concerning course of study,
is amended to read as follows:
(c) Each barber college shall abide by the following guidelines:
(1) Conduct a course of study and training which shall consist
of not fewer than five hundred fifty (550) hours for students who are
licensed cosmetologists, and as to all other students not fewer than one
thousand five hundred (1,500) clock hours. The average daily schedule of each
student shall consist of the following:
(A) One and one-fourth (1¼) clock hours of theoretical
study in a classroom;
(B) One and one-fourth (1¼) clock hours of scientific
barber practice in a classroom other than general clinic; and
(C) Five (5) clock hours of general barber practice. Each
barber college shall average five (5) services per day per student;
(2) Teach no fewer than one-third (⅓) of its total enrollment
scientific barbering practice, theory, or general barber practice at one (1)
time;
(3)(2) Post a daily schedule of its course of study in its
general clinic where it can be easily read by all students; and
(4)(3) Require a maximum attendance in all subjects. A student
shall not be permitted to spend more than eight (8) hours in the college in
any one (1) day.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-20-408(e)(1), concerning the minimum
number of barber chairs in a training room of a school or college of
barbering, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) A minimum of fifteen (15) sixteen (16) barber chairs in modern
03-18-2025 14:06:20 LGL123

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 HB1673
and new condition;

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-20-420 is amended to read as follows:
17-20-420. Application for enrollment.
(a) A school of barbering shall not enroll or admit any student
thereto unless the student makes and files in duplicate a duly verified
application submits to the State Board of Barber Examiners:
(1) An application; and
(2) The fee prescribed for the administration of the student
application and student license.
(b) This The application required under subsection (a) of this section
shall be of such form and contain such matters as the State Board of Barber
Examiners board may prescribe.
(b) One (1) copy of the application shall be retained by the school
enrolling or admitting the student, and one (1) copy shall be filed by the
school with the board, along with the fee prescribed for the administration
of the student application and student license.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 17-20-421(a)(3), concerning applications
for admission to a barber college or examination to receive a certificate of
registration as a registered barber, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The application for enrollment shall be accompanied with
identification of the applicant in the form of:
(A) A copy of his or her Social Security card;
(B) A driver's license or a state-issued or federally-
issued identification card; and
(C)(B) Two (2) passport-sized photographs of the applicant
with the name of the applicant on the back.

/s/L. Johnson






03-18-2025 14:06:20 LGL123